Rhode Island statutes. Title 34 Property
Article III Management of Condominium
34-36.1-3.16.
Lien for assessments.

The association has a lien on a unit for any assessment levied against that unit or fines imposed against its unit owner from the time the assessment or fine becomes due. The association’s lien may be foreclosed in accordance with and subject to the provisions of §

34-36.1-3.21

. Unless the declaration otherwise provides, attorney’s fees, charges, late charges, fines, and interest charged pursuant to §

34-36.1-3.02(a)(10)

— (12) are enforceable as assessments under this section. If an assessment is payable in installments, the full amount of the assessment is a lien from the time the first installment thereof becomes due.

A lien under this section is prior to all other liens and encumbrances on a unit except:

Liens and encumbrances recorded before the recordation of the declaration and not subordinated to the declaration,

A first mortgage or deed of trust on the unit recorded before the date on which the assessment sought to be enforced became delinquent, and

Liens for real estate taxes and other governmental assessments or charges against the unit.

The lien is also prior to any mortgage or deed of trust described in subdivision (b)(1)(ii) of this section to the extent of the common expense assessments based on the periodic budget adopted by the association pursuant to §

34-36.1-3.15(a)

which would have become due in the absence of acceleration during the six (6) months immediately preceding the foreclosure of the interest of the unit owner including any costs and reasonable attorney’s fees not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), incurred in the collection of any delinquent assessment or other charges by legal proceedings or otherwise and all costs of foreclosure held pursuant to section

34-36.1-3.21

, including, but not limited to, publication, advertising and auctioneer costs, said foreclosure costs not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) (for a total aggregate of attorney’s fees and costs of seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500)).

The priority amount under subdivision (b)(2) above shall not include any amounts attributable to special assessments, late charges, fines, penalties, and interest assessed by the association.

When any portion of the unit owner’s share of the common expenses has been delinquent for at least sixty (60) days the association shall first send a notice stating the amount of the delinquency to the unit owner by certified mail, return receipt requested, and first class mail. The association shall also send a notice by certified mail, return receipt requested, and first class mail, stating the amount of the delinquency to the holder of the first mortgage or deed of trust as it appears in the land evidence records at the address appearing in the mortgage or deed of trust or such other address as the first mortgagee may provide in writing to the association.

The failure of the association to send the first mortgagee the notice of sixty (60) days delinquency of common expense assessments, as described in subsection (b)(4) above, shall not affect the priority of the lien for up to six (6) months common expense assessments, but the priority amount shall not include any costs or attorney’s fees.

This subsection does not affect the priority of mechanics’ or materialmen’s liens, or the priority of liens for other assessments made by the association.

Unless the declaration otherwise provides, if two (2) or more associations have liens for assessments created at any time on the same real estate, those liens have equal priority.

Recording of the declaration constitutes record notice and perfection of the lien. No further recordation of any claim of lien for assessment under this section is required but is permitted.

A lien for unpaid assessments is extinguished unless proceedings to enforce the lien are instituted within six (6) years after the full amount of the assessments becomes due.

This section does not prohibit actions to recover sums for which subsection (a) creates a lien or prohibit an association from taking a deed in lieu of foreclosure.

A judgment or decree in any action brought under this section must include costs and reasonable attorney’s fees for the prevailing party.

The association, upon written request shall furnish to a unit owner or the holder of a first mortgage or deed of trust granted with respect to such unit owner’s unit a recordable statement setting forth the amount of unpaid assessments against his or her unit. The statement must be furnished within ten (10) business days after receipt of the request and is binding on the association, the executive board, and every unit owner.

The association may take action for failure of a unit owner to pay any assessment or other charges pursuant to this section. The delinquent unit owner shall be obligated to pay all expenses of the executive board, including reasonable attorney’s fees, incurred in the collection of the delinquent assessment or other charges by legal proceedings or otherwise, such attorney’s fees and other charges also being a lien on the unit. The delinquent unit owner shall also be obligated to pay any amounts paid by the executive board for taxes or on account of superior liens or otherwise to protect its lien, which expenses and amounts, together with accrued interest, shall be deemed to constitute part of the delinquent assessment and shall be collectible as such.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 329, § 2; P.L. 1991, ch. 247, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 369, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 8, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 324, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 84, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 459, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 479, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 246, § 1.

34-36.1-3.17.
Other liens affecting the condominium.

Except as provided in subsection (b), a judgment for money against the association if recorded is not a lien on the common elements, but is a lien in favor of the judgment lienholder against all of the units in the condominium at the time the judgment was entered. No other property of a unit owner is subject to the claims of creditors of the association.

If the association has granted a security interest in the common elements to a creditor or the association pursuant to §

34-36.1-3.12

, the holder of that security interest shall exercise its right against the common elements before its judgment lien on any unit may be enforced.

Whether perfected before or after the creation of the condominium, if a lien other than a deed of trust or mortgage, including a judgment lien or lien attributable to work performed or materials supplied before creation of the condominium, becomes effective against two (2) or more units, the unit owner of an affected unit may pay to the lienholder the amount of the lien attributable to his or her unit, and the lienholder, upon receipt of payment, promptly shall deliver a release of the lien covering that unit. The amount of the payment must be proportionate to the ratio which that unit owner’s common expense liability bears to the common expense liabilities of all unit owners whose units are subject to the lien. After payment, the association may not assess or have a lien against that unit owner’s unit for any portion of the common expenses incurred in connection with that lien.

A judgment against the association must be indexed in the name of the condominium and the association and, when so indexed, is notice of the lien against the units.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 329, § 2.

34-36.1-3.18.
Association records.

The association shall keep financial records sufficiently detailed to enable the association to comply with §

34-36.1-4.09

. All financial and other records shall be made reasonably available for examination within thirty (30) days of a request by any unit owner and his or her authorized agent.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 329, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 285, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 309, § 1.

34-36.1-3.19.
Association as trustee.

With respect to a third person dealing with the association in the association’s capacity as a trustee, the existence of trust powers and their proper exercise by the association may be assumed without inquiry. A third person is not bound to inquire whether the association has power to act as trustee or is properly exercising trust powers. A third person, without actual knowledge that the association is exceeding or improperly exercising its powers, is fully protected in dealing with the association as if it possessed and properly exercised the powers it purports to exercise. A third person is not bound to assure the proper application of trust assets paid or delivered to the association in its capacity as trustee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 329, § 2.

34-36.1-3.20.
Enforcement of declaration, by-laws and rules.

An executive board may impose and assess fines against a unit owner as a method of enforcing the association’s declaration, bylaws, and rules and regulations. Such fines may include, but are not limited to, daily fines for continued violative conduct in the future. Notice and the opportunity for a hearing must be provided to an alleged violator before a fine is imposed and assessed. All fines shall be a lien on the unit charged.

Daily fines imposed and assessed pursuant to this section shall be no more than one hundred dollars ($100) per day for residential condominiums nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) per day for commercial condominiums.

Fines other than daily fines imposed and assessed pursuant to this section shall be no more than five hundred dollars ($500) for residential condominiums and no more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for commercial condominiums.

Any condominium declaration, bylaw, rule or regulation which purports to establish a maximum fine or daily fine shall be invalid.

Hearings conducted pursuant to this section shall be before the executive board or a person designated by the executive board.

A decision in a hearing held pursuant to this section must include costs in all cases and reasonable attorney’s fees, if the prevailing party is represented by a member of the Rhode Island Bar. Such attorney’s fees and costs shall also be a lien on the unit charged.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 247, § 2.

34-36.1-3.21.
Foreclosure of condominium lien.

If a condominium unit owner shall default in the payment of any assessment, fine, or any other charge which is a lien on the unit in favor of the association or its assigns, then it shall be lawful for the association or its assigns, through its executive board, to sell the unit of any defaulting unit owner and the benefit and equity of redemption of the defaulting unit owner and his or her heirs, executors, administrators, and assigns therein, at public auction upon the premises or at such other place, if any, as may be designated for that purpose by the association or its assigns.

The association must first mail written notice of the time and place of sale to the defaulting unit owner, at his or her last known address and the holder of the first mortgage or deed of trust of record at the address for service required by subdivision

34-36.1-3.16(b)(4)

, both by certified mail, return receipt requested, at least twenty (20) days prior to publishing said notice; second, the association must publish the same at least once each week for two (2) successive weeks in a public newspaper. The time of sale shall be at least fifteen (15) days after the publication of the first notice in a public newspaper. Publication shall be as follows:

If the condominium is situated in the city of Central Falls, in a public newspaper published daily in the city of Pawtucket;

If the condominium is situated in the town of North Providence, in a public newspaper published daily in the city of Providence;

If the condominium is situated in any of the towns of Cumberland, Lincoln, Smithfield or North Smithfield, in a public newspaper published daily in either the city of Pawtucket, Woonsocket, or Providence;

If the condominium is situated in the county of Providence elsewhere than in the above last named cities and towns, in a public newspaper published daily in the city of Providence;

If the condominium is situated in the county of Newport, in a public newspaper published daily in the city of Newport; but if there be no such newspaper so published, then in some public newspaper published anywhere in the county of Newport;

If the condominium is situated in any of the counties of Bristol, Kent, or Washington, in a public newspaper published daily in the city or town in which the condominium is situated; or in some public newspaper published daily in the county in which the condominium is situated or in a public newspaper published daily in the city of Providence.

The sale may be adjourned from time to time, provided that publishing of the notice shall be continued, together with a notice of the adjournment or adjournments, at least once each week in the same newspaper; and third, the association must mail written notice of the same to any person or entity having an interest of record in the unit, recorded not later than thirty (30) days prior to the date originally scheduled for the sale, including without limitation, the holder of any mortgage or deed of trust with respect to the unit, to the address of the person or entity may have provided for that purpose in the land evidence records or at any other address the person or entity may have provided the association in writing, such notice to be given by regular or certified mail, return receipt requested, at least ten (10) days prior to the date originally scheduled for such sale; and in his or her or their own name or names, or as the attorney or attorneys of the defaulting unit owner (for that purpose by these presents duly authorized and appointed with full power of substitution and revocation) to make, execute, and deliver to the purchaser or purchasers at the sale a good and sufficient deed or deeds of the defaulted condominium unit, in fee simple, and to receive the proceeds of the sale or sales, and from the proceeds to retain all sums secured by the lien in favor of the association as of the date of such sale together with all expenses incident to such sale or sales, or for making deeds hereunder, and for fees of counsel and attorneys, and all costs or expenses incurred in the exercise of such powers, and all taxes, assessments, and premiums for insurance, if any, either theretofore paid by the association, or its assigns, or then remaining unpaid upon the defaulted condominium unit, rendering and paying the surplus of the proceeds of sale, if any there be, over and above the amounts to be retained, and paid to other encumbrances of record, together with a true and particular account of such sale or sales, expenses, and charges, to the defaulting unit owner, or his or her heirs, executors, administrators or assigns. The sale or sales shall forever be a perpetual bar against the defaulting unit owner and his or her heirs, executors, administrators and assigns, and all persons claiming the defaulted condominium unit, so sold, by, through or under him, her, them or any of them.

Within seven (7) days after the foreclosure sale, the association shall send an additional written notice to the holder of the first mortgage or deed of trust of record as appears in the land evidence records, as provided in subdivision

34-36.1-3.16(b)(4)

by certified mail, return receipt requested, and first class mail, identifying the name of the highest bidder and the amount of the bid.

Any foreclosure sale held by the association pursuant to subsection (a) above, and the title conveyed to any purchaser or purchasers pursuant to such sale, shall be subject to any lien or encumbrance entitled to a priority over the lien of the association pursuant to §

34-36.1-3.16(b)

.

Any foreclosure sale held by the association pursuant to subsection (a) above, shall be subject to a thirty (30) day right of redemption running in favor of the holder of the first mortgage or deed of trust of record. The right of redemption shall be exercised by tendering payment to the association in full of all assessments due on the unit together with all attorney’s fees and costs incurred by the association in connection with the collection and foreclosure process within thirty (30) days of the date of the post-foreclosure sale notice sent by the association pursuant to subdivision (a)(4) above. Otherwise, the right of redemption shall terminate thirty (30) days from the date of the post-foreclosure sale notice sent by the association pursuant to subdivision (a)(4) above.

Upon request the association shall provide to any person or entity having an interest of record in the unit: (1) an itemized statement of the amounts owed the association by the defaulting unit owner, separating common expense assessments referred to in §

34-36.1-3.16(b)(2)

from interest, attorney’s fees, fines and other charges secured by the lien of the association; and (2) a copy of the most recent periodic budget adopted by the association pursuant to §

34-36.1-3.15(a)

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 369, § 2; P.L. 1992, ch. 8, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 84, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 459, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 479, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 246, § 1.